District of Columbia statutes.
8-419

Severability.

If any provision of this chapter is declared unconstitutional, or the applicability thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of this chapter and applicability thereof to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-70, § 20, 24 DCR 6867
1981 Ed., § 6-751.19.